Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.475

Annexation of territory within regional transit authorities.

When territory is annexed under this chapter to a code city located within the boundaries of a regional transit authority, the territory is simultaneously included within the boundaries of the authority and subject from the effective date of the annexation to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations applicable within the code city with respect to the authority. The code city must notify the authority of the annexation.

[ 2010 c 19 s 2.]